Illinois, session 104th, SB79.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $4,500,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education for grants to 7school districts to contract with organizations that directly 8provide students and school-based staff with mental telehealth 9services that are billed to Medicaid and commercial insurance 10plans. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 122025.